Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB426.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Native Habitats at Commonwealth Facilities Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." Any of the following:(1) Any office, department, authority, board, multistate agency or commission of the executive branch, independent agency or State-affiliated entity. The term includes:<--1234567891011121314151617 (i) The Governor's Office.(ii) The Office of Attorney General.(iii) The Department of the Auditor General.(iv) The Treasury Department.(v) An organization established by the Constitution of Pennsylvania, a statute or an executive order which performs or is intended to perform an essential governmental function.(2) The term does not include a judicial or legislative agency."COMMONWEALTH AGENCY." AN EXECUTIVE AGENCY, INDEPENDENT AGENCY OR STATE-AFFILIATED ENTITY."Commonwealth project." A construction or maintenance activity that is conducted by a Commonwealth agency or at a Commonwealth facility that involves landscape planting improvements."Department." The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Independent agency." Any board, commission or other agency or officer of the Commonwealth that is not subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor. The term does not include a legislative or judicial agency."Judicial agency." A court of the Commonwealth or any other entity or office of the unified judicial system."Legislative agency." Any of the following:(1) The Senate.(2) The House of Representatives.(3) The Capitol Preservation Committee.(4) The Center for Rural Pennsylvania.(5) The Joint Legislative Air and Water Pollution 20250HB0426PN3652 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Control and Conservation Committee.(6) The Joint State Government Commission.(7) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.(8) The Legislative Data Processing Committee.(9) The Independent Regulatory Review Commission.(10) The Legislative Reference Bureau.(11) The Local Government Commission.(12) The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.(13) The Legislative Reapportionment Commission.(14) The Legislative Office for Research Liaison.(15) The Legislative Audit Advisory Commission."Pollinator meadow." An area of native vegetation consisting of more than 50% native wildflowers that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The vegetation has the floral resources present throughout the growing season and host plants for the larvae of monarch butterflies and other native pollinators to provide for the entire life cycle of monarch butterflies and other native pollinators.(2) The vegetation was established from seed mixes comprised of at least 0.5% native milkweed seed.(3) The vegetation is protected from insecticide exposure."State-affiliated entity." A Commonwealth authority or Commonwealth entity. The term includes the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency and any entity established thereby, the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board, the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency, the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Board, the State System of Higher Education, a 20250HB0426PN3652 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community college, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority, the State Public School Building Authority, the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association and the Pennsylvania Higher Educational Facilities Authority. The term does not include a State-related institution."State-related institution." Any of the following:(1) Temple University.(2) The University of Pittsburgh.(3) The Pennsylvania State University.(4) Lincoln University.Section 3. Duties of Commonwealth agencies regarding native plants.(a) Native plants.--A Commonwealth agency shall have the following duties when conducting a Commonwealth project at a Commonwealth facility:(1) Prioritize, as feasible with respect to schedule and product supply, the use of native plants untreated with systemic insecticides over non-native plants when developing green spaces or during landscape planting.(2) Consider the benefits of using native plants untreated with systemic insecticides at the Commonwealth project, including habitat creation, supporting native pollinators, providing food and shelter to insect and wildlife populations, decreasing soil erosion and landscape water usage, increasing sediment control, controlling storm water runoff and decreasing maintenance needs.(b) Turfgrass and lawns.--A Commonwealth agency shall consider the planting of native plants untreated with systemic 20250HB0426PN3652 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insecticides or creating pollinator meadows on appropriate areas of existing or planned turfgrass and lawns, particularly unused areas when growing turfgrass or lawns at a Commonwealth facility.(c) Updates.--A Commonwealth agency that maintains Commonwealth facility design standards that are specific to the Commonwealth agency or has landscape and maintenance development standards on or after the effective date of this subsection shall update the standards to reflect prioritizing native plants.Section 4. Duties of department regarding pollinator habitats and native plants untreated with systemic insecticides.(a) Pollinator habitats.--The department shall maintain existing pollinator meadows or pollinator gardens on or after the effective date of this subsection or establish new pollinator meadows or pollinator gardens at resource management centers and State Park offices where space is available to serve as pollinator habitat and demonstration areas for the public.(b) Native plants.--The department shall have the following duties:(1) Maintain and distribute to Commonwealth agencies guidance on the use and maintenance of native plants in Commonwealth projects.(2) Draft a native pollinator conservation plan and revise the plan every five years. The department shall make the native pollinator conservation plan available to Commonwealth agencies and the public. The department shall promulgate regulations specifying which native plants are covered under this act and include the following information 20250HB0426PN3652 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the native pollinator conservation plan:(i) The current status of native pollinators.(ii) The main risks to native pollinators.(iii) The best practices to mitigate the risks to native pollinators.(iv) The current efforts of the department to conserve and protect native pollinators and their habitats.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 4 shall take effect in 18 months.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0426PN3652 - 6 - 12345678910111213